Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 6. Membership.

Sec. 10.50.155.
Membership requirements.

A person may become a member in a limited liability company if the person acquires a limited liability company interest

directly from the limited liability company

in compliance with an operating agreement of the company; or

with the written consent of all of the members of the company if an operating agreement of the company does not provide for acquiring an interest directly from the company; or

by assignment of the interest by a company member in compliance with AS

10.50.165

.

A limited liability company must have one or more members.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.

Sec. 10.50.160.
Effective date of admission.

The effective date of the admission of a member to a limited liability company is the later of the date

when the company is organized;

established in an operating agreement of the company; or

when the person’s admission is reflected in the records of the company if an operating agreement of the company does not establish an effective date.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.165.
Authorization for assignee to become member.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, an assignee of a limited liability company interest may not become a member unless all other members consent.

An operating agreement of the company may specify the manner for evidencing the consent required by (a) of this section. If an operating agreement does not specify the manner for evidencing the consent, the consent is evidenced by a written instrument that is dated and signed by the members.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.170.
Rights, powers, and liabilities of assignee who becomes a member.

An assignee who becomes a member has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers of a member under the articles of organization, an operating agreement, and this chapter, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities of a member under the articles of organization, an operating agreement, and this chapter.

In addition to the liabilities imposed under (a) of this section, an assignee of a limited liability company interest who becomes a member of the company is liable for an obligation of the assignor to make a contribution under AS

10.50.280

that is not imposed by the articles of organization, an operating agreement, or otherwise by this chapter.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, an assignee who becomes a member is not liable for liabilities that are unknown to the assignee when the assignee becomes a member and that cannot be determined from the written records of the company maintained under AS

10.50.860

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.180.
Rights of assignor when assignee becomes a member.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, when an assignee of a member’s limited liability company interest becomes a member of the company with respect to the assignor’s entire interest, the assignor ceases to be a member or to have the power to exercise the rights of a member.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.185.
Resignation of member.

A member may not resign from a limited liability company except at the time or upon the happening of events specified in the operating agreement of the company and in accordance with the operating agreement of the company.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary under applicable law, unless an operating agreement of the company provides otherwise, a member may not resign from a limited liability company before the dissolution and winding up of the limited liability company.

If the resignation of a member violates an operating agreement of the company, in addition to any remedy otherwise available under applicable law, a limited liability company may recover from the resigning member damages for breach of the operating agreement and may offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to the resigning member.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company and except for termination under AS

10.50.205

, after a member resigns from a limited liability company, the rights of the former member are those of an assignee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.

Sec. 10.50.190.
Withdrawal before end of term or undertaking. [Repealed, § 23 ch 78 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 10.50.195.
Remedies for wrongful withdrawal. [Repealed, § 23 ch 78 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 10.50.205.
Removal of member.

A person’s membership in a limited liability company may not be terminated by removal except as provided by (b) or (c) of this section.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a person’s membership in a limited liability company terminates if the person assigns all of the person’s interest in the company and if a majority of the members who have not assigned their interests in the company authorize the removal of the person as a member.

If an operating agreement of the company provides for the removal of a member with or without cause, a person’s membership in a limited liability company terminates if the person is removed as a member in the manner and under the circumstances provided in the agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.210.
Effect of death or incompetency on membership.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement or by the written consent of all of the members at the time, the membership of a member of a limited liability company who is an individual terminates if the member dies, or if a court of competent jurisdiction enters an order adjudicating the member incompetent to manage the member’s person or property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.215.
Termination of membership held by trust, trustee, or estate.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company or by the written consent of all of the members of the company at the time, the limited liability company membership held by a trust or trustee terminates when the trust terminates. In this subsection, “terminates” does not include the substitution of a new trustee.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company or by the written consent of all of the members of the company at the time, the limited liability company membership held by an estate terminates when the estate’s entire limited liability company interest is distributed by the fiduciary of the estate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.220.
Termination on dissolution of member.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company or by the written consent of all of the members of the company at the time, a limited liability company membership of a member that is a separate limited liability company terminates when the member dissolves and begins to wind up its affairs.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company or by the written consent of all of the members of the company at the time, a limited liability company membership of a member that is a corporation terminates when the corporation is dissolved and 90 days lapse without reinstatement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.225.
Other events terminating membership.

Unless otherwise provided in writing in an operating agreement of the company or authorized by the written consent of all of the members of the company at the time, a person’s membership in a limited liability company terminates when the person

makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy;

is adjudicated a bankrupt or insolvent;

files a petition or answer seeking for the person a reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under law;

files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against the member in a proceeding in the nature of (1) — (4) of this subsection; or

seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the person or of all or a substantial part of the person’s property.

Unless otherwise provided in writing in an operating agreement of the company or consented to in writing by all of the members of the company at the time, a person’s membership in a limited liability company terminates when

a proceeding against the person seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief is not dismissed within 120 days after the commencement of the proceeding; or

an appointment, without the person’s consent, of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the person or of all or a substantial part of the person’s property is not vacated or stayed within 120 days after the appointment or after the expiration of the stay.

The members of a limited liability company may provide in writing in an operating agreement that other events terminate a membership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.240.
Effect of election. [Repealed, § 23 ch 78 SLA 1997.]